Vermont, session 2025-2026, S151.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. APPLICATION AND CONSTRUCTION
In applying and construing this act, consideration shall be given to the
following:
(1) There has been a disturbing increase in meritless lawsuits having the
effect of discouraging the efforts of volunteers who dedicate their time and
energy to advancing the missions of Vermont’s nonprofit organizations and
Vermont governmental entities.
VT LEG #382221 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.151
2025 Page 2 of 6
(2) The willingness of volunteers to offer their services to Vermont’s
nonprofit organizations and Vermont governmental entities is deterred by the
potential for meritless liability actions against them. As a result:
(A) Vermont’s nonprofit organizations and Vermont governmental
entities have been adversely affected by the withdrawal of volunteers from
boards of directors and service in other capacities; and
(B) the contribution of these organizations and entities to their
communities has been diminished, resulting in fewer and higher cost programs
than would be obtainable if volunteers were participating.
(3) It is in the public interest to encourage continued volunteer efforts
for Vermont’s nonprofit organizations and Vermont governmental entities, and
such efforts should not be chilled through abuse of the judicial process.
Sec. 2. 12 V.S.A. § 1041a is added to read:
§ 1041a. UNCOMPENSATED VOLUNTEER WORK FOR NONPROFIT
ORGANIZATION OR GOVERNMENTAL ENTITY; SPECIAL
MOTION TO STRIKE
(a) A defendant in an action arising from the defendant’s uncompensated
volunteer work for a nonprofit organization or governmental entity may file a
special motion to strike under this section.
(b) A special motion to strike under this section shall be filed with the court
and served on all parties not more than 60 days after the filing of the
VT LEG #382221 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.151
2025 Page 3 of 6
complaint. A party may file a response to the motion not more than 15 days
after the motion is served on the party. The court may extend the time limits of
this subsection for good cause shown.
(c)(1) The filing of a special motion to strike under this section shall stay
all discovery proceedings in the action. Except as provided in subdivision (2)
of this subsection, the stay of discovery shall remain in effect until the court
rules on the special motion to strike.
(2) The court, on motion and for good cause shown, may order that
limited discovery be conducted for the purpose of assisting its decision on the
special motion to strike.
(d) The court shall hold a hearing on a special motion to strike not more
than 30 days after service of the motion unless good cause exists for an
extension.
(e)(1) The court shall grant the special motion to strike, unless the plaintiff
shows that:
(A)(i) the defendant was acting outside the scope of the defendant’s
responsibilities as a volunteer for the nonprofit organization or governmental
entity at the time of the act or omission; or
(ii) the alleged harm was caused by the defendant’s recklessness,
gross negligence, or intentional misconduct; and
(B) the defendant’s acts caused actual injury to the plaintiff.
VT LEG #382221 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.151
2025 Page 4 of 6
(2) In making its determination, the court shall consider the pleadings
and supporting and opposing affidavits stating the facts upon which the
liability or defense is based.
(f)(1) If the court grants the special motion to strike, the court shall award
costs and reasonable attorney’s fees to the defendant. If the court denies the
special motion to strike and finds the motion is frivolous or is intended solely
to cause unnecessary delay, the court shall award costs and reasonable
attorney’s fees to the plaintiff.
(2) Neither the court’s ruling on the special motion to strike nor the fact
that it made such a ruling shall be admissible in evidence at any later stage of
the case, and no burden of proof or degree of proof otherwise applicable shall
be affected by the ruling.
(g) An order granting or denying a special motion to strike shall be
appealable in the same manner as an interlocutory order under Rule 5 of the
Vermont Rules of Appellate Procedure.
(h) This section shall not apply to:
(1) any enforcement action or criminal proceeding brought by the State
of Vermont or any political subdivision thereof; or
(2) a case involving tortious interference with legally protected health
care as provided in section 7302 of this title.
(i) As used in this section:
VT LEG #382221 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.151
2025 Page 5 of 6
(1) “Governmental entity” means any agency, board, department,
commission, committee, branch, instrumentality, or authority of the State or
any agency, board, committee, department, branch, instrumentality,
commission, or authority of any political subdivision of the State.
(2) “Nonprofit organization” means a nonprofit organization qualified as
tax-exempt under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as
from time to time amended, or classified as a public benefit corporation under
11B V.S.A. § 17.05.
(3) “Uncompensated volunteer work” means acts or omissions by a
person performing services, including services as a director, officer, trustee, or
direct service volunteer, for a nonprofit organization or a governmental entity
if the person does not receive:
(A) compensation other than reasonable reimbursement or allowance
for expenses actually incurred; or
(B) any other thing of value in lieu of compensation, in excess of
$500.00 per year.
Sec. 3. REPORT
On or before July 1, 2026, the Court Administrator shall report to the Senate
and House Committees on Judiciary on the frequency and outcomes of special
motions to strike made pursuant to this act.
VT LEG #382221 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.151
2025 Page 6 of 6
Sec. 4. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #382221 v.1